Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 3.1. Records, Tapes and Other Recorded Devices.

§ 59.1-41.1.
“Owner” defined.

As used in this chapter, “owner” means the person who owns the sounds fixed in any master phonograph record, master disc, master tape, master film or other device used for reproducing recorded sounds on phonograph records, discs, tapes, films, videocassettes,
or other articles now known or later developed on which sound is recorded and from which the transferred sounds are directly or indirectly derived, or the person who owns the rights to record or authorize the recording of a live performance.

History.
1972, c. 618; 1989, c. 240.

Law Review.

For note, “Goldstein v. California and the Protection of Sound Recordings: Arming the States for Battle with the Pirates,” see 31 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 604 (1974).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
17 M.J. Statutes, § 35.

§ 59.1-41.2.
Recording of live concerts or recorded sounds and distribution, etc., of such recordings unlawful in certain circumstances.

It shall be unlawful for any person to:

Knowingly transfer or cause to be transferred, directly or indirectly by any means, any sounds at a live concert or any sounds recorded on a phonograph record, disc, wire, tape, film, videocassette, or other article now known or later developed on which
sounds are recorded, with the intent to sell, rent or cause to be sold or rented, or to be used for profit through public performance, such article on which sounds are so transferred, without consent of the owner; or

For commercial advantage or private financial gain, manufacture, distribute, transport or wholesale, or cause to be manufactured, distributed, transported or sold as wholesale, or possess for such purposes any article with the knowledge that the sounds
are so transferred, without consent of the owner.

This section shall not apply to any person engaged in radio or television broadcasting who transfers, or causes to be transferred, any such sounds other than from the sound track of a motion picture intended for, or in connection with broadcast or telecast
transmission or related uses, or for archival purposes.

History.
1972, c. 618; 1989, c. 240.

Law Review.

For article, “Copyright Liability for Audio Home Recording: Dispelling the Betamax Myth,” see 68 Va. L. Rev. 1505 (1982).

§ 59.1-41.3.
Selling or renting, etc., of certain recorded devices unlawful.

It shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly sell, rent, cause to be sold or rented, or possess for the purpose of selling or renting any recorded device that has been produced, manufactured, distributed, or acquired in violation of any provision
of this chapter.

History.
1972, c. 618; 1989, c. 240.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
9B M.J. Indictments, Informations, and Presentments, § 59; 17 M.J. Statutes, § 35.

§ 59.1-41.4.
Recorded devices to show true name of manufacturer.

Ninety days after July 1, 1972, every recorded device sold, rented or transferred or possessed for the purpose of sale, rental or transfer by any manufacturer, distributor, or wholesale or retail merchant shall contain on its packaging the true name and
address of the manufacturer. The term “manufacturer” shall not include the manufacturer of the cartridge or casing itself. The term “recorded device” means the tangible medium upon which sounds or images are recorded or otherwise stored,
and includes any phonograph record, disc, wire, tape, videocassette, film or other medium now known or later developed on which sounds or images are recorded or otherwise stored.

History.
1972, c. 618; 1989, c. 240.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
9B M.J. Indictments, Informations, and Presentments, § 59; 17 M.J. Statutes, § 35.

§ 59.1-41.5.
Confiscation of nonconforming recorded devices.

Ninety days after July 1, 1972, it shall be the duty of all law-enforcement officers, upon discovery, to confiscate all recorded devices that do not conform to the provisions of § 59.1-41.4. The nonconforming recorded devices shall be delivered to the
attorney for the Commonwealth of the county in which the confiscation was made. The attorney for the Commonwealth by court order may give the same to a charitable or educational organization. The provisions of this section shall apply
to any nonconforming recorded device, regardless of the requirement in § 59.1-41.3 of knowledge or intent of a retail seller.

History.
1972, c. 618.

§ 59.1-41.6.
Penalties for violation of chapter.

Violations of this chapter are punishable as follows:

Except as otherwise provided in this section, any person convicted of an offense under this chapter is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

Any person convicted of an offense involving at least 100 unlawful sound recordings or twenty unlawful audio visual recordings during any 180-day period is guilty of a felony punishable by a term of imprisonment of not less than one nor more than two
years, or in the discretion of the jury or the court trying the case without a jury, confinement in jail for not more than twelve months and a fine of not more than $5,000, either or both;

Any person convicted of an offense involving at least 1,000 unlawful sound recordings or 65 unlawful audio visual recordings during any 180-day period is guilty of a felony punishable by a term of imprisonment of not less than one nor more than three
years, or in the discretion of the jury or the court trying the case without a jury, confinement in jail for not more than twelve months and a fine of not more than $100,000, either or both; and

Any second or subsequent felony offense under this chapter shall be punishable by a term of imprisonment of not less than one nor more than three years, or in the discretion of the jury or the court trying the case without a jury, confinement in jail
for not more than twelve months and a fine of not more than $100,000, either or both.

Upon conviction of a person of any offense under this chapter, the court in its judgment of conviction may order the forfeiture and destruction or other disposition of all infringing recordings and of all implements, devices and equipment used by the
person in the manufacture of the infringing recordings.

History.
1972, c. 618; 1989, c. 240; 2007, c. 805.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 805 added the exception to the beginning of subdivision 1; in subdivisions 2 and 3, inserted “person convicted of an,” and substituted “is guilty of a felony” for “shall be”; in subdivision 5, substituted “Upon conviction of a
person” for “If a person is convicted” and “by the person” for “or intended to be used”; and made minor stylistic changes.